src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tas: # Noun 136 'eng /est ??/fin' - full paradigm
     tas+N+Sg+Nom: tas
     tas+N+Sg+Gen: tas
     tas+N+Sg+Par: tassõ
     tas+N+Sg+Dat: tassõn
     tas+N+Sg+Ins: tassõks
     tas+N+Sg+Ill: tassõ
     tas+N+Sg+Ela: tassõst
     tas+N+Pl+Nom: tassõd
     tas+N+Pl+Gen: tassõd
     tas+N+Pl+Par: tassidi
     tas+N+Pl+Dat: tassõdõn
     tas+N+Pl+Ins: tassõdõks
     tas+N+Pl+Ill: tassiž
     tas+N+Pl+Ela: tassist
